pl: Rozmiar dysku: 1 cal; 1-1/2 cala; 1/2 cala; 1/4 cala; 2-1/2 cala; 3/4 cala; 3/8 cala; Inne
lt-LT: Lizdo dydis: 1 colio; 1–1/2 colio; 1/2 colio; 1/4 colio; 2–1/2 colio; 3/4 colio; 3/8 colio; Kita
ja: ドライブサイズ: 1インチ; 1-1/2インチ; 1/2インチ; 1/4インチ; 2-1/2インチ; 3/4インチ; 3/8インチ; その他
nb: Stasjonsstørrelse: 1 tomme; 1–1/2 tommer; 1/2 tomme; 1/4 tomme; 2–1/2 tomme; 3/4 tomme; 3/8 tomme; Annet
de: Größe des Antriebs: 1 Zoll; 1-1/2 Zoll; 1/2 Zoll; 1/4 Zoll; 2-1/2 Zoll; 3/4 Zoll; 3/8 Zoll; Sonstiges
da: Drevstørrelse: 1 tommer; 1-1/2 tommer; 1/2 tommer; 1/4 tommer; 2-1/2 tommer; 3/4 tommer; 3/8 tommer; Andet
el: Μέγεθος υποδοχής: 1 ίντσα; 1-1/2 ίντσας; 1/2 ίντσας; 1/4 ίντσας; 2-1/2 ίντσας; 3/4 ίντσας; 3/8 ίντσας; Άλλο
vi: Kích thước ổ đĩa: 1 inch; 1-1/2 inch; 1/2 inch; 1/4 inch; 2-1/2 inch; 3/4 inch; 3/8 inch; Khác
fr: Taille du lecteur: 1 pouce; 1-1/2 pouce; 1/2 pouce; 1/4 pouce; 2-1/2 pouces; 3/4 pouce; 3/8 pouce; Autre
hu: Hajtás mérete: 1 hüvelyk; 1–1/2 hüvelyk; 1/2 hüvelyk; 1/4 hüvelyk; 2–1/2 hüvelyk; 3/4 hüvelyk; 3/8 hüvelyk; Egyéb
sv: Drivningsstorlek: 1 tum; 1–1/2 tum; 1/2 tum; 1/4 tum; 2–1/2 tum; 3/4 tum; 3/8 tum; Övrigt
ko: 드라이브 크기: 1인치; 1.5인치; 0.5인치; 0.25인치; 2.5인치; 3/4인치; 3/8인치; 기타
fi: Vetopyörän koko: 1-tuumainen; 1 1/2 -tuumainen; 1/2-tuumainen; 1/4 -tuumainen; 2 1/2 -tuumainen; 3/4-tuumainen; 3/8-tuumainen; Muu
it: Dimensione dell’unità: 1 pollice; 1-1/2 pollice; 1/2 pollice; 1/4 pollice; 2-1/2 pollice; 3/4 pollice; 3/8 pollice; Altro
nl: Aandrijfmaat: 1 inch; 1-1/2 inch; 1/2 inch; 1/4 inch; 2-1/2 inch; 3/4 inch; 3/8 inch; Andere
ro-RO: Dimensiune unitate de acționare: 1 inch; 1-1/2 inch; 1/2 inch; 1/4 inch; 2-1/2 inch; 3/4 inch; 3/8 inch; Altele
pt-BR: Tamanho da unidade: 1 polegada; 1-1/2 polegada; 1/2 polegada; 1/4 polegada; 2-1/2 polegadas; 3/4 polegadas; 3/8 polegadas; Outro
es: Tamaño de la llave: 1 pulgada; 1-1/2 pulgada; 1/2 pulgada; 1/4 pulgada; 2-1/2 pulgada; 3/4 pulgada; 3/8 pulgada; Otros
tr: Sürücü boyutu: 1 inç; 1-1/2 inç; 1/2 inç; 1/4 inç; 2-1/2 inç; 3/4 inç; 3/8 inç; Diğer
hr-HR: Veličina prihvata: 1 inč; 1 – 1/2 inča; 1/2 inča; 1/4 inča; 2 – 1/2 inča; 3/4 inča; 3/8 inča; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tamanho da caixa: 1 polegada; 1-1/2 polegadas; 1/2 polegada; 1/4 polegada; 2-1/2 polegada; 3/4 polegada; 3/8 polegada; Outro
bg-BG: Размер на захвата: 1 инч; 1-1/2 инча; 1/2 инча; 1/4 инча; 2-1/2 инча; 3/4 инча; 3/8 инча; Други
cs: Velikost jednotky: 1 palec; 1–1/2 palce; 1/2 palce; 1/4 palce; 2–1/2 palce; 3/4 palce; 3/8 palce; Jiné
sk-SK: Veľkosť pohonu: 1 palec; 1-1/2 palca; 1/2 palca; 1/4 palca; 2-1/2 palca; 3/4 palca; 3/8 palca; Iné
zh-CN: 驱动器尺寸: 1 英寸; 1.5 英寸; 0.5 英寸; 0.25 英寸; 2.5 英寸; 0.75 英寸; 0.375 英寸; 其他
sl-SI: Velikost nastavka: 1 palec; 1–1/2 palec; 1/2 palca; 1/4 palca; 2-1/2 palčni; 3/4 palca; 3/8 palca; Drugo
ru: Размер посадочного квадрата: 1 дюйм; 1-1/2 дюйма; 1/2 дюйма; 1/4 дюйма; 2-1/2 дюйма; 3/4 дюйма; 3/8 дюйма; Другой
th: ขนาดไดรฟ์: 1 นิ้ว; 1-1/2 นิ้ว; 1/2 นิ้ว; 1/4 นิ้ว; 2-1/2 นิ้ว; 3/4 นิ้ว; 3/8 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
en: Drive size: 1 inch; 1-1/2 inch; 1/2 inch; 1/4 inch; 2-1/2 inch; 3/4 inch; 3/8 inch; Other
zh-TW: 驅動器尺寸: 1 英吋; 1-1/2 英吋; 1/2 英吋; 1/4 英吋; 2-1/2 英吋; 3/4 英吋; 3/8 英吋; 其他